Nebraska, session 109, LB413.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB413 LB413
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 70-655, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
70-655 (1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the board
of directors of any district organized under or subject to Chapter 70,
article 6, shall have the power and be required to fix, establish, and
collect adequate rates, tolls, rents, and other charges for electrical
energy, water service, water storage, and for any and all other
commodities, including ethanol and hydrogen, services, or facilities
sold, furnished, or supplied by the district, which rates, tolls, rents,
and charges shall be fair, reasonable, nondiscriminatory, and so adjusted
as in a fair and equitable manner to confer upon and distribute among the
users and consumers of commodities and services furnished or sold by the
district the benefits of a successful and profitable operation and
conduct of the business of the district. Rates and charges may be
differentiated based on load size, load factor, firm and nonfirm service,
technology risks, length of service commitment, and other objective
criteria.
(2) The board of directors may negotiate, fix, establish, and
collect rates, tolls, rents, and other charges for users and consumers of
electrical energy and associated services or facilities different from
those of other users and consumers. Any negotiated rates, tolls, rents,
and other charges for a commercial or industrial customer shall be
effective for no more than five years and in no case shall such rates,
tolls, rents, and charges include a production component that is less
than the incremental production cost of supplying such services if (a)
such customer has entered an agreement with the state or any political
subdivision to provide an economic development project pursuant to state
or local law and (b) such economic development project has projected new
or additional electrical load requirements greater than five hundred
kilowatts and a minimum annual load demand factor of sixty percent during
the applicable billing period. This subsection shall also apply to any
-2-

LB413 LB413
2025 2025
nonprofit corporation organized for the purpose of furnishing electric
service pursuant to the Electric Cooperative Corporation Act or the
Nebraska Nonprofit Corporation Act, any agency created pursuant to the
Municipal Cooperative Financing Act, and any municipality engaged in
furnishing electrical service to customers at retail or wholesale.
(3) In order to facilitate the merger and consolidation of
districts, the board of directors of a merged or consolidated district
may negotiate, fix, establish, and collect rates, tolls, rents, and other
charges for consumers in the service area of one or more of the
predecessor districts which are different than rates, tolls, rents, and
other charges for consumers in the remaining service area of the merged
or consolidated district. Any different rates, tolls, rents, and other
charges pursuant to this subsection shall be effective for no more than
five years after the date of merger or consolidation and shall be based
on cost of service or other rate studies showing that adoption of
dissimilar rates for consumers in otherwise similar rate classes is
needed to effectuate the merger or consolidation. This subsection shall
also apply in the event of a merger or consolidation of any nonprofit
corporation organized for the purpose of furnishing electric service
pursuant to the Electric Cooperative Corporation Act or the Nebraska
Nonprofit Corporation Act.
Sec. 2. Original section 70-655, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-3-